District of Columbia statutes.
3-3101

Expired

Business Regulatory Reform Commission.

Expired.

Mar. 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-212, § 2, 41 DCR 8029
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 7, 44 DCR 1271
1981 Ed., § 2-4101.
This section is referenced in § 47-395.
Review and revision of regulations and permit and application processes, see § 47-395.